New Jersey, session 222, S500.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.2021, c.439 (C.App.A:9-89) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.  There is hereby established the "New Jersey Nonprofit Security Grant Program" (NJNSGP) in the Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness, which shall provide grants to eligible nonprofit organizations at greatest risk of attack as annually appropriated (1) to hire permanent or temporary security personnel limited to federal, State, county, or municipal law enforcement officers, special law enforcement officers appointed pursuant to P.L.1985, c.439 (C.40A:14-146.8 et seq.), or security officers registered pursuant to P.L.2004, c.134 (C.45:19A-1 et seq.), and (2) for acquisition of target-hardening equipment for the purpose of preparedness against threats, attacks, and other violent acts. b.    The director shall administer the New Jersey Nonprofit Security Grant Program.  There shall annually be distributed to approved eligible nonprofit organizations a maximum grant of up to [$10,000] $50,000 per approved application for personnel or security-related training or planning, and a maximum grant of up to [$50,000] $150,000 for target-hardening equipment.  The director may adjust these amounts based upon the final availability of funds, analytical trends, and emerging threats. c.     An eligible nonprofit organization shall apply to the Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness to receive a grant under the program, for [either] costs of security personnel [or], security-related training or planning, acquisition of target-hardening equipment, or [both] all the foregoing [; however, an applicant only may be awarded funds for either personnel or for equipment in a fiscal year]. The Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness first shall evaluate all applications as to whether they are at high-risk of terrorist attack, threats, domestic extremism, and other violent acts.  The costs of hiring security personnel shall include the cost of hiring security personnel for an event within the geographic boundaries of the State primarily organized by the applicant away from the applicant's physical location as recorded on the grant application and for which the applicant bears legal liability.  The funds distributed under the program shall be utilized solely for security investments made within this State.  No funds shall be utilized to support security needs while traveling outside of this State. Applicants may apply annually for a disbursement of funds for costs of security personnel or security-related training or planning, and may be awarded grants in successive years.  The Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness shall assign a preference for applicants who have not received a federal security grant that includes funding for hiring security personnel in the last two federal grant cycles. Applicants may apply annually for grant funds for acquisition of target-hardening equipment.  The Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness shall assign a preference for applicants who have not received either a federal or State security grant for target-hardening equipment in the last two grant cycles. d.    The Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness shall request annually as part of its annual budget proposal a minimum of [$2,000,000] $10,000,000 to fund the grants authorized pursuant to this section.  The office also shall pursue and develop, with the Department of Law and Public Safety, the United States Department of Homeland Security, and any other applicable State or federal agency, any available federal, State, local, and private funding for the grants authorized pursuant to this section. e.     Of the amount appropriated to the program, five percent shall be allocated to the Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness to be used to administer the program. (cf: P.L.2021, c.439, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.